Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1131, as
amended by Section 145, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1131), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1131. Service Oklahoma shall annually notify all
persons within the state who have a previous registration on record
of the period for registration renewal. Service Oklahoma shall send
the notifications through the United States mail and to the
electronic mail address provided by the person. If a person does
not provide an electronic mail address then Service Oklahoma shall
notify the person only through the United States mail. Electronic
Req. No. 11548 Page 1

mail notifications shall be sent weekly until such time as the
registration is renewed. The notifications shall contain all
necessary information for such registration and licensing including
a breakdown of all charges to be paid by the owner and shall contain
instructions as to the procedure for renewal upon presentation to a
licensed operator or by return mail to Service Oklahoma's state
office. The content and form of the notice shall be determined by
Service Oklahoma. Use of a postcard or electronic mail type renewal
notice is specifically permitted. Service Oklahoma shall provide
information on its public website instructing persons on the
procedure for obtaining an annual notification via electronic mail,
outlining all charges and fees associated with the registration of a
vehicle, as well as an explanation of the apportionment of vehicle
fees and penalties. The cost of mailing shall be One Dollar ($1.00)
for license plates and fifty cents ($0.50) for decals, titles or
other forms or devices provided in this act. Provided, that Service
Oklahoma may adjust any mailing costs as deemed appropriate to allow
for increased or additional fees charged by the United States Postal
Service.
Failure by any applicant to receive notification of renewal as
provided by this act shall not excuse the applicant from properly
obtaining any registration or license at the proper time by
presenting proof of ownership to Service Oklahoma's state office or
to a licensed operator.
Req. No. 11548 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11548 JBH 12/11/24





















Req. No. 11548 Page 3